Hawaii statutes.
[D.] Gender
Equity in Sports

§302A-461 Gender equity in athletics.
(a) No person, on the basis of sex, shall be excluded from participating in,
be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination in athletics
offered by a public high school, pursuant to Public Law 92-318, Title IX of the
federal Education Amendments of 1972.

(b) This section shall apply to public schools
as defined in section 302A-101; provided that it shall apply to grades nine to
twelve only.

(c) No private right of action at law shall
arise under this section. [L 2000, c 229, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 133, §9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next